Missouri, session 2026, SB1498.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 191.960, to read as
follows:
191.960. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Cancer Patients' Bill of Rights".
2. The department of health and senior services shall
make the cancer patients' bill of rights readily available
and easily accessible online.
3. The cancer patients' bill of rights shall be as
follows:
(1) Cancer patients shall have a right to understand
fully their diagnoses and be informed about treatment
options in culturally appropriate and understandable
languages;
(2) Cancer patients shall have a right to transparent
and timely processes that ensure access to contracting
oncology specialists, diagnostic testing, and accurate
interpretations of those tests;

SB 1498 2
(3) Cancer patients shall have a right to contracting
cancer subspecialists who have expertise in the treatment of
their subtypes of cancers when complex decisions are needed;
(4) Cancer patients shall have a right to medical
treatments for pain management and other services that
support their overall health;
(5) Cancer patients shall have the right to
contracting National Cancer Institute-designated
comprehensive cancer centers and leading academic medical
centers for the management of complex cancers that require
multiple experts of high-risk or emerging therapies; and
(6) Cancer patients shall have a right to relevant
clinical trials, medical research, and cutting-edge
innovation, including evidence-supported precision medicine.
✓